South Dakota, session 2026, HB1069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-5-5 be AMENDED:
32-5-5. Vehicle license fees provided by this chapter are based, except Except as
otherwise specifically provided, vehicle license fees are assessed and paid annually and
based upon manufacturers' weights, including accessories. If as follows:
(1) For a noncommercial motor vehicle that is an automobile, pickup truck, or van with
a manufacturer's shipping weight, including accessories, of ten thousand pounds
or less, the license fees for such a motor vehicle shall be as provided by in § 32-5-
6. However, if the noncommercial motor vehicle is a pickup truck that weighs more
than six thousand pounds, the owner has the choice of paying the, except that the
owner of a pickup truck weighing more than six thousand pounds may elect to pay
license fees pursuant to either § 32-5-6 or paying the license fees based on the
gross weight of the motor vehicle as provided in § 32-5-6.3. The license fees for
§ 32-5-6.3;
(2) For a noncommercial motor home are, as provided by in § 32-5-6.1. The license
fees for;
(3) For a motorcycle are, as provided by in § 32-5-9. The license fees for;
(4) For a snowmobile are, as provided by in § 32-5-9.1. The license fees for; and
(5) For any other noncommercial motor vehicle are based:
(a) Based on the gross weight of the motor vehicle and are as; and
(b) As provided in § 32-5-6.3.
If the department determines the actual dry weight of any model vehicle with
accessories to be is at variance with the manufacturers' shipping weight, the department
shall must certify the correct weight to be used in determining fees. These fees shall be
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1069A 2 1069
assessed and paid annually. Upon initial registration of a vehicle, the fees shall be assessed
based upon the date of sale.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-5:
The license fees applicable to a noncommercial trailer registered in this state,
pursuant to § 32-5-8, which has an actual weight of three thousand pounds or less, are
one-time fees paid only upon the owner's initial registration of the trailer and may not be
assessed annually.
The registration is valid for the useful life of the trailer, unless:
(a) The actual weight of the trailer exceeds three thousand pounds, in which case the
trailer is subject to an annual assessment of license fees, as provided in § 32-5-8,
based on the new actual weight; or
(b) Title to the trailer is transferred, in which case the new owner must, within forty-
five days after the transfer, register the trailer and pay the one-time license fees,
as provided in § 32-5-8.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.